dictionaries/ie/index.aff
# Occidental (Interlingue)
# v1.2
#
# Copyright 2015-2023 Smirnova O. I.
#
# Licensed under the Apache License, Version 2.0 (the "License");
# you may not use this file except in compliance with the License.
# You may obtain a copy of the License at
#
#     http://www.apache.org/licenses/LICENSE-2.0
#
# Unless required by applicable law or agreed to in writing, software
# distributed under the License is distributed on an "AS IS" BASIS,
# WITHOUT WARRANTIES OR CONDITIONS OF ANY KIND, either express or implied.
# See the License for the specific language governing permissions and
# limitations under the License.

SET UTF-8

WORDCHARS -
TRY áéíeinatrsloucdmpvgfbhqxyjkóúzöüäçčšžÍ

NOSUGGEST !

BREAK 1
BREAK -

NOSPLITSUGS
KEEPCASE +
COMPOUNDMIN 2
#COMPOUNDFLAG c
COMPOUNDBEGIN a
COMPOUNDEND b
ONLYINCOMPOUND c
COMPOUNDPERMITFLAG d
WARN ?

ICONV 7
ICONV à á
ICONV ì í
ICONV è é
ICONV ﬁ fi
ICONV ﬂ fl
ICONV œ oe
ICONV æ ae

REP 9
REP a á
REP à á
REP ^in ín
REP ^ne ín
REP li$ men
REP ism$ isme
REP l' li
REP ľ li
REP ^l' li_

MAP 7
MAP aá(a')
MAP eé(e')
MAP iíy
MAP oó
MAP uú
MAP t(th)
MAP c(ch)k(qu)

PFX N Y 5
PFX N 0 ín [^í]
PFX N 0 ín í[^n]
PFX N 0 im [mbp]
PFX N 0 il l
PFX N 0 ir r

PFX I Y 1
PFX I i í i

PFX j Y 20
PFX j 0 yotta .
PFX j 0 zetta .
PFX j 0 exa   .
PFX j 0 peta  .
PFX j 0 tera  .
PFX j 0 giga  .
PFX j 0 mega  .
PFX j 0 kilo  .
PFX j 0 hecto .
PFX j 0 deca  .
PFX j 0 deci  .
PFX j 0 centi .
PFX j 0 milli .
PFX j 0 micro .
PFX j 0 nano  .
PFX j 0 pico  .
PFX j 0 femto .
PFX j 0 atto  .
PFX j 0 zepto .
PFX j 0 yocto .

SFX A Y 7
SFX A 0 s  [aeiou]
SFX A 0 i  [^aeious]
SFX A 0 is [^aeious]
SFX A 0 i  [^é]s
SFX A 0 is [^é]s
SFX A és esi  és
SFX A és esis és

SFX E Y 2
SFX E 0 ssim/M  i
SFX E 0 issim/M [^i]

SFX H Y 13
SFX H 0 o  [^eo]
SFX H 0 os [^eo]
SFX H 0 a  [^eo]
SFX H 0 as [^eo]
SFX H 0 e  [^eo]
SFX H 0 es [^eo]
SFX H 0 s  [oe]
SFX H e o  e
SFX H e os e
SFX H e a  e
SFX H e as e
SFX H o a  o
SFX H o as o

SFX M Y 2
SFX M 0 men  .
SFX M 0 imen [^ic]

SFX S Y 3
SFX S 0 s  [aeioucgkmáéíóú]
SFX S 0 es [^aeiouáíóú]
SFX S 0 e  [^aeiouáéíóú]

SFX V Y 8
SFX V r 0/d    r
SFX V r t/HMN  r
SFX V r s      r
SFX V r nt/HMN  [^i]r
SFX V r ent/HMN ir
SFX V r ye     r
SFX V r nd/AS  [^i]r
SFX V r end/AS ir

SFX C Y 9
SFX C i ant   i
SFX C 0 esim/MS [^i]
SFX C 0 esim/MS ri
SFX C i esim/MS ci
SFX C 0 plic  [iu]
SFX C 0 uplic [^iu]
SFX C 0 ene/S [^i]
SFX C 0 ene/S ri
SFX C i ene/S ci

SFX X Y 10
SFX X e 0/cd e
SFX X o 0/cd o
SFX X a 0/cd a
SFX X r 0/cd ar
SFX X er 0/cd er
SFX X e -/cd e
SFX X o -/cd o
SFX X a -/cd a
SFX X r -/cd ar
SFX X er -/cd er

PFX n Y 2
PFX n 0 ín .
PFX n 0 in .

SFX B Y 8
SFX B r   bil/AMN    [ai]r
SFX B r   bilitá/n   [ai]r
SFX B er  ibil/AMN   [^dr]er
SFX B er  ibilitá/n  [^dr]er
SFX B der sibil/AMN  der
SFX B der sibilitá/n der
SFX B rer sibil/AMN  rer
SFX B rer sibilitá/n rer

SFX G Y 2
SFX G r  bilitás/n  [ai]r
SFX G er ibilitás/n er

SFX T Y 8
SFX T me t   sme
SFX T me te  sme
SFX T me tes sme
SFX T me tic/M sme
SFX T m  t   sm
SFX T m  te  sm
SFX T m  tes sm
SFX T m  tic/M sm

SFX Q Y 10
SFX Q 0  ic/M   [^aeox]
SFX Q e  c/M    ie
SFX Q a  c/Mp   ia
SFX Q e  ic/M   [^si]e
SFX Q o  ic/M   o
SFX Q se tic/M  [^s]se
SFX Q xe ctic/M xe
SFX Q x  ctic/M x
SFX Q 0  tic/M  ma
SFX Q a  0/M    ica

SFX Z Y 5
SFX Z r  tion  [ai]r
SFX Z er tion  [aeou]er
SFX Z er ion   [stx]er
SFX Z der sion der
SFX Z rer sion rer

SFX O Y 10
SFX O r  tione  [ai]r
SFX O r  tiones [ai]r
SFX O er tione  [aeou]er
SFX O er tiones [aeou]er
SFX O er ione   [stx]er
SFX O er iones  [stx]er
SFX O der sione  der
SFX O der siones der
SFX O rer sione  rer
SFX O rer siones rer

SFX R Y 10
SFX R r  tor/S [ai]r
SFX R r  tori  [ai]r
SFX R er tor/S [aoeu]er
SFX R er tori  [aoeu]er
SFX R er or/S  [st]er
SFX R er ori   [st]er
SFX R der sor/S der
SFX R der sori  der
SFX R rer sor/S rer
SFX R rer sori  rer

SFX L Y 3
SFX L 0 l/M  a
SFX L 0 al/M [^ae]
SFX L e al/M e

SFX U Y 6
SFX U 0 tte   e
SFX U 0 ttes  e
SFX U o ette  o
SFX U o ettes o
SFX U 0 ette  [^eo]
SFX U 0 ettes [^eo]

SFX F Y 4
SFX F 0 ssa   e
SFX F 0 ssas  e
SFX F 0 essa  [^e]
SFX F 0 essas [^e]

SFX J Y 4
SFX J 0 in [^eéo]
SFX J e in e
SFX J é in é
SFX J o in o

PFX p Y 26
PFX p A a A
PFX p B b B
PFX p C c C
PFX p D c D
PFX p E e E
PFX p F f F
PFX p G g G
PFX p H h H
PFX p I i I
PFX p J j J
PFX p K k K
PFX p L l L
PFX p M m M
PFX p N n N
PFX p O o O
PFX p P p P
PFX p Q q Q
PFX p R r R
PFX p S s S
PFX p T t T
PFX p U u U
PFX p V v V
PFX p W w W
PFX p X x X
PFX p Y y Y
PFX p Z z Z

SFX K Y 2
SFX K 0 n/pAHb  a
SFX K 0 an/pAHb [^a]

SFX k Y 7
SFX k 0  s/pAHb  e
SFX k ia es/pAHb ia
SFX k ia és/pb   ia
SFX k a  es/pAHb [^i]a
SFX k a  és/pb   [^i]a
SFX k 0  es/pAHb [^ae]
SFX k 0  és/pb   [^ae]

SFX g Y 5
SFX g r  ge/S  ar
SFX g er age/S er
SFX g 0  age/S [^ae]r
SFX g 0  age/S [^er]
SFX g e  age/S e

SFX m Y 8
SFX m r  ment/d   [ai]r
SFX m r  mentes/d [ai]r
SFX m r  ment/d   [^eu]er
SFX m r  mentes/d [^eu]er
SFX m er ment/d   [eu]er
SFX m er mentes/d [eu]er
SFX m 0  ment/d   [^r]
SFX m 0  mentes/d [^r]

SFX t Y 2
SFX t 0 tá/S  i
SFX t 0 itá/S [^i]

SFX u Y 5
SFX u r   tura/S [ai]r
SFX u der sura/S der
SFX u rer sura/S rer
SFX u er  ura/S  [^draeou]er
SFX u er  tura/S [aeou]er

SFX v Y 5
SFX v r   tiv/Md [ai]r
SFX v der siv/Md der
SFX v rer siv/Md rer
SFX v er  iv/Md  [^draou]er
SFX v er  tiv/Md [aou]er

SFX w Y 5
SFX w r   tiv/MS [ai]r
SFX w der siv/MS der
SFX w rer siv/MS rer
SFX w er  iv/MS  [^draou]er
SFX w er  tiv/MS [aou]er

SFX y Y 2
SFX y ia o-/pacd ia
SFX y e  o-/pacd e

SFX z Y 5
SFX z 0 osi/AM [^aáeo]
SFX z e osi/AM e
SFX z 0 si/AM  o
SFX z a osi/AM a
SFX z á osi/AM á
