dictionaries/ie/index.dic
abate/SF
abbate/SF
Abyssinia/K!
Acaia/K
accompleer/Vm
acrescer/Vm
adequat/NM
adherer/VZOw
adivinar/VZO
adjurar/VZ
afflicter/VZv
alegar/VZO
alegri/Mt
Alemannia/K
alesar/Vg
alligar/VR
Alsatia/K
alterar/VZORB
altitudine/L
aluminisar/VZ
amabil/MEt
ambasade/SF
ambassade/SF
ambigui/ANt
ambulatori/A
ameliorar/VZORB
ampere/Sbj
anacronisme/T
analog/SM
analogie/SQ
Andalusia/K
anxios/AMt
aperter/VZbu
apprentiso/H
aprofundar/VZm
apt/ASNME
aptitá/nS
Apulia/K
arbitrar/VZRg
Arcadia/K
argil/J
argill/z
argot/SQ
Armenia/K
arrenda/S
asociar/VZO
assimilar/VZOv
astonar/VBZm
astricter/VZw
Aten/K
atingibil/N
atomisme/T
audir/VBZORv
augmentar/VBZOw
aurifer/A
Austria/Ky
auxiliar/VASZRNb
avanguardist/SQ
avansar/Vm
avantagear/V
avo/HU
Azerbaijan/k
babylones/AH!
balotar/VZOgm
banal/Mt
barbe/Sz
barril/SU
Basel/Ka
bell/AEHMNtb
binom/SL
bit/Sj
blindar/Vg
bon/AMEta
borges/AHt
bosillar/VZgu
boyscout/S
brev/SAMt
brigante/Sg
bronze/SXJa
cabine/SU
caleidoscop/SQ
calvinisme/T
camine/SXa
camuflar/Vg
canin/H
canonisar/VZO
capabilitá/Sn
capill/Sz
capillar/SAu
car/HE
caricar/Vu
carre/SU
cathode/S
causar/VZRB
caut/AMN
centdu/C
certificar/V
cervo/HJ
changear/VZRBbm
chilan/H
China/k
chovinisme/T
cindre/SLz
circumspect/Mz
ciselar/Vu
citrate/SQ
clamore/Sz
clapotar/Vg
claritá/n
clementie/N
clique/SU
coercir/VZBv
collectiv/ASQ
colonisar/VZOR
combinar/VZORBv
commisser/VZO
comparar/VBZORw
compatir/VBGm
competent/ASENM
compilar/VZOR
comprensibilitá/n
computator/SAL
comte/SFb
comun/tSL
conformisme/Tb
congester/Vv
congruentie/SN
conjecter/VZOBu
conjugar/VBZORv
conquestar/VZOR
consistentie/N
contemplar/VZORv
contentar/Vmv
contestabil/MN
contigui/t
contracter/VZORuv
contrir/VZOv
converter/VRZOBS
coquetto/H
coralle/SXaz
coron/SU
corporal/SNM
corupter/VBZuv
cos/SQg
covar/VZOu
cranie/SLQ
cristall/SAab
Cristo/Xa
cuidosi/MN
cupar/VZu
cupre/QXay
curt/ME
curtar/VZOgv
custa/SXab
damajan/S
damasco/J
datar/Vgb
decidu/CS
deciquincent/C
decriminalisar/VZ
dedicar/VZO
defibrilar/ZR
demarcar/VZOR
demon/SQ
demonstrar/VZORBwb
derangear/Vm
derivar/VBZOwb
descrir/VZOv
desfelici/AM
desir/Sz
desirar/VB
desquietar/V
destituer/VZO
detecter/VRZOw
devastar/VZORv
diari/M
diaterman/t
dietico/H
diffuser/VZOR
digar/Vbm
diminuer/VZOw
discret/LM
disposir/VZOw
distracter/VZOv
doan/SLg
dorme/SUXaz
dormir/VZRw
du/Cb
duantdu/C
ducent/C
dur/ME
durar/VBZO
dynastie/SQ!
effectiv/AME
efortiar/VZ
egocentrism/ST
ejecter/VZORB
elaborar/VZO
electroscop/S
eloquent/ME
enoyar/Vv
epigraf/SQ
episcop/HLFb
eremite/SLg
escapar/VZm
essentialitá/Sn
Eurasia/K
europan/Hb
evaporar/VZOBRv
exactitá/Sn
excellent/AE
exchangear/Vm
executer/VHZORBw
exemplar/ASQt
expert/SN
expirar/VZO
explicar/VBZORv
exploder/VZOw
expressionisme/T
expurgar/VZOR
falv/AS
farad/Sj
faruch/AM
fascinar/VZ
fatal/Mt
favorar/VZOBb
febre/Sz
fenomen/SL
ferrar/VZg
ferre/SQJz
filar/VRmu
Finnland/k
flagrada/S
flare/SXa
fon/SQb
forest/SJLb
formalisme/T
fortificar/VZORw
fosse/SU
fossilifer/A
Francia/ky
frenar/VZg
frir/VR
fructe/SXga
funebr/ASL
furtor/AH
galline/HJ
gay/AMEt
generar/VZORBv
géneric/M
geniter/VRuw
Germania/Syb
gigant/SAQF
glattitá/SN
glorie/SNz
gracil/Mt
grafite/X
gramm/Sbj
grandios/AMt
graniera/S
griffar/Vu
guerre/SL
gutte/SU
guvernar/VZRBm
hareng/H
harnessar/Vm
Hindustan/k
hipertextu/SQ
humanisme/T
humilar/VZO
illustr/ASE
ilustri/AE
immediat/M
incendiar/VZOR
incivilitá/I
indelebilitá/I
India/Sy
individual/SMt
indivisibilitá/I
Indochina/k
Indonesia/j
inelasticitá/I
infant/HLag
infelicitá/I
inflammar/VZORv
inflexibilitá/I
informar/VZORvwb
ingeniero/SXb
inhagar/VZu
ininteligibilitá/I
inleibilitá/I
inmagasinar/Vgm
ínmediat/M
inmerser/VZB
inmortalitá/I
ínmortisar/V
inoportunitá/I
inponderabilitá/I
inpunitibilitá/I
inreconossibilitá/I
inresponsabilitá/I
insensibilitá/I
insidie/S
insipiditá/I
instabilitá/I
institutor/H
instrettar/VZO
intenibilitá/I
internationalisme/ST
interrupter/VZORv
intoxicar/VZORw
introspecter/VZv
inveloppar/Vm
invidie/Sz
Iran/k
irreprochabil/M
Island/k
Italia/y
Judeia/Qyb
junter/VZOmuvb
juridic/ML
juvel/SU
Kasakhstan/k
Kurdistan/k
labirint/SJ
latinisar/VZ
latun/SJ
laudar/VBZOvb
lavar/VZRgmu
legalitá/N
legislater/VZORuvw
legúmin/SA!
leon/HJF
letor/HS
Lettonia/K
ligar/VZORBmuvb
lin/SJz
lingue/SLUab
litre/Sbj
lobul/S
lontan/SAEt
lumen/j
lurar/Vvb
Luxemburg/K
lynchar/VZO!
magnete/SXab
malfortun/Az
malin/t
maroccan/H
marvelosi/M
marxisme/Tb
matre/SJUb
Melanesia/K
melodie/SQ
meridian/SL
mersiar/Vvm
metre/SQbj
millibar/S
million/SC
misparturir/Vu
moderar/VBZORv
modest/MEHt
monacho/H
morfinisme/T
multilingui/At
munir/VZO
musica/SXab
mut/HMt
mutual/Mt
nickel/J
ninant/Ca
ninantun/C
nobli/AN
nod/SLUz
nominar/VZORb
Norvegia/k
notar/VBGZO
notori/MQt
nube/Sz
obstinar/VZO
occidentalism/ST
ocios/At
octette/Sj
oficina/S
opresser/VZORv
ordinar/VAMEZORmtb
organic/M
osse/SJXab
ott/Cb
ottcent/C
oxidar/VZB
parlamentarisme/T
partial/MNt
pascal/Sj
pasilogie/QL
passar/VXab
paster/VHu
pastor/SF
patrin/HLt
pedicul/Sz
pelle/SJab
periodale/S
permaner/V
permear/VBG
permissiv/AS
pesa/SXa
pictor/HF
pietosi/t
pigméo/SQ
pisc/SJ
Polonia/k
porcelan/SAJ
portar/VBZRXanvb
porte/SU
posir/VZORuwb
posser/VBG
possibilitá/Sn
postar/Vgm
practic/HML
practicar/VB
precios/AESMt
predir/VZOR
preparar/VZORuv
presbyt/S!
prescrir/VZOu
presentir/Vm!
prim/ALEt
privatisar/VZ
probar/VBG
profet/HSFQb
progenerar/VZO
prophet/HSFQb!
prosper/SAt
prostrar/VZO
pruvar/VBXab
psice/SQy
psyche/SQy!
punir/VZORBv
Punjab/k
quarantun/C
querell/Sz
quinantdu/C
rapid/AMSEt
rar/EMAt
recent/ME
reformisme/Tb
regenerar/VZRv
regionalisme/S
regular/AMVZORBmtv
rehabilitar/VZv
reiterar/VZO
remarcar/VB
remediabil/MN
renunciar/VZ
reparar/VZORBuv
reprochar/V
rhodesian/H
robotica/Q
sac/SU
sacrament/SL
salpetre/Sz
sanct/ASFt
sanctionar/Vm
sclusero/S
scrir/VRZOBXabuv
seconde/Sj
secretarie/HLFb
selectiv/nt
settant/Ca
signar/VZRb
silentios/AM
similar/Vv
simular/VZOR
sindicalisme/STb
six/Cb
sixcent/C
sol/AMSbt
solid/MESNt
Somalia/K
son/SLUab
spacie/SLz
specific/M
spectre/SL
stalactite/SJ
stand/S
statica/Q
strecar/VZOb
stult/Ht
sucie/Sz
supplicar/V
Svedia/k
svin/HUa
tabelle/SX
Taiwan/k
temerar/AHt
tendresse/S
tenui/Et
territoria/SL
topograf/SQ
torder/Vuv
tranquilitá/n
tranquillitá/n
transportar/VZOB
triantun/C
trincar/VRgm
trovar/VRgb
tumefar/VZO
Tunisia/K
Turkestan/k
tutor/SF
ulterior/AM
und/Sz
unitari/M
urear/V
urs/HSJU
usual/MN
utilitarisme/T
variabil/SE
venjar/VRmv
verisimil/t
Vienna/k
vin/Saz
vírgine/HS
visibilitá/n
visitar/VZOR
vive/SXa
volt/Sabj
watt/Sbj
XIII/C!
Yugoslavia/K
